South Dakota, session 2026, HB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 33-7:
If a member of the National Guard donates the member's organ for the purpose of
transplantation to another individual, the Department of the Military must pay a stipend
to the member.
If the member has an operation recovery time of two weeks or less, as certified by
a licensed medical practitioner, the stipend must equal fifty percent of the member's
active-duty basic monthly pay. If the member has a recovery time of more than two
weeks, as certified by a licensed medical practitioner, the stipend must equal one hundred
fifty percent of the member's active-duty basic monthly pay.
To be eligible for the stipend, the member shall:
(1) Follow all procedures and protocols established by the National Guard regarding
the donation of an organ by a member;
(2) At least one month prior to the organ procurement operation, provide the
Department of the Military notice of the member's intent to donate the organ; and
(3) Undergo the organ procurement operation at a transplant hospital, as defined in
§ 34-26-49.
A member qualifies for a stipend only if the member does not receive living donor
paid leave from the member's employer.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.